Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.648

[Art. 82] Solicitation.

(1) Any person subject to this code who solicits or advises another or others to desert in violation of RCW 38.38.660 or mutiny in violation of RCW 38.38.696 shall, if the offense solicited or advised is attempted or committed, be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense, but, if the offense solicited or advised is not committed or attempted, he or she shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

(2) Any person subject to this code who solicits or advises another or others to commit an act of misbehavior before the enemy in violation of RCW 38.38.716 or sedition in violation of RCW 38.38.696 shall, if the offense solicited or advised is committed, be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense, but, if the offense solicited or advised is not committed, he or she shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 2011 c 336 s 776; 1963 c 220 s 81.]